North Dakota statutes. TITLE 10 Corporations
CHAPTER 10-19.1 North Dakota Business Corporation Act
10-19.1-148.1.
Delivery to and filing of records by secretary of state and effective date.

A record authorized or required to be delivered to the secretary of state for filing under this chapter must be captioned to describe the purpose of the record, be in a medium permitted by the secretary of state, and be delivered to the secretary of state. If the secretary of state determines that a record complies with the filing requirements of this chapter, then the secretary of state shall file the record and return a copy of the filed record to the person who delivered it to the secretary of state for filing. That person shall then send a copy of the filed record to the person on whose behalf the record was filed.

Upon request and payment of a fee provided in section 10-19.1-147, the secretary of state shall send to the requester a certified copy of the requested record.

Except as otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, a record delivered to the secretary of state for filing under this chapter may specify a delayed effective date within ninety days. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a record filed by the secretary of state is effective:

If a record does not specify a delayed effective date within ninety days, then on the date the record is filed as evidenced by the endorsement of the secretary of state of the date on the record.

If the record specifies a delayed effective date within ninety days, then on the specified date.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 100, § 41.

10-19.1-148.2.
Correcting a filed record.

With respect to correction of a filed record:

Whenever a record authorized by this chapter to be filed with the secretary of state has been filed and inaccurately records the action referred to in the record, contains an inaccurate or erroneous statement, or was defectively or erroneously signed, sealed, acknowledged, or verified, the record may be corrected by filing a statement of correction.

A statement of correction:

Must:

Be signed by:

The person that signed the original record; or

By a person authorized to sign on behalf of that person;

Set forth the name of the corporation that filed the record;

Identify the record to be corrected by description and by the date of its filing with the secretary of state;

Identify the inaccuracy, error, or defect to be corrected; and

Set forth a statement in corrected form of the portion of the record to be corrected.

May not revoke or nullify the record.

The statement of correction must be filed with the secretary of state.

With respect to the effective date of correction:

A certificate issued by the secretary of state before a record is corrected, with respect to the effect of filing the original record, is considered to be applicable to the record as corrected as of the date the record as corrected is considered to have been filed under this subsection.

After a statement of correction has been filed with the secretary of state, the original record as corrected is considered to have been filed:

On the date the statement of correction was filed:

As to persons adversely affected by the correction; and

For the purposes of subsection 3 of section 10-19.1-01.2; and

On the date the original record was filed as to all other persons and for all other purposes.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 100, § 42.

10-19.1-149.
Secretary of state — Certificates and certified copies to be received in evidence.

All certificates issued by the secretary of state and all copies of records filed in accordance with this chapter, when certified by the secretary of state, may be taken and received in all courts, public offices, and official bodies as evidence of the facts stated.

A certificate by the secretary of state under the great seal of this state, as to the existence or nonexistence of the facts relating to corporations which would not appear from a certified copy of any of the foregoing records or certificates, may be taken and received in all courts, public offices, and official bodies as evidence of the existence or nonexistence of the facts stated.

Any certificate or certified copy issued by the secretary of state under this section may be created and disseminated as an electronic record with the same force and effect as if produced in a paper form.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 81; 2005, ch. 100, § 43; 2011, ch. 87, § 24.

10-19.1-149.1.
Secretary of state — Confidential records.

Any social security number or federal tax identification number disclosed or contained in any record filed with the secretary of state under this chapter is confidential. The secretary of state shall delete or obscure any social security number or federal tax identification number before a copy of any record is released to the public.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 85, § 22; 2005, ch. 100, § 44.

10-19.1-150.
Secretary of state — Forms to be furnished by the secretary of state.

All annual reports required by this chapter to be filed in the office of the secretary of state must be made on forms prescribed by the secretary of state. Forms for all other records to be filed in the office of the secretary of state may be furnished by the secretary of state upon request. However, the use of such records, unless otherwise specifically required by law, is not mandatory.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 82; 2005, ch. 100, § 45.

10-19.1-151.
Miscellaneous — Foreign trade zones.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Act of Congress” means the Act of Congress approved June 18, 1934, entitled an Act to provide for the establishment, operation, and maintenance of foreign trade zones and ports of entry of the United States, to expedite and encourage foreign commerce and for other purposes, as amended, and commonly known as the Foreign Trade Zone Act of 1934 [48 Stat. 998; 19 U.S.C. 81a et seq.].

“Private corporation” means a corporation authorized under this chapter, one of the purposes of which is to establish, operate, and maintain a foreign trade zone by itself or in conjunction with a public corporation.

“Public corporation” means this state, a political subdivision of this state, any municipality of this state, any public agency of this state, or any other corporate instrumentality of this state.

Any private corporation or public corporation has the power to apply to the proper authorities of the United States for a grant of the privilege of establishing, operating, and maintaining foreign trade zones and foreign trade subzones and to do all things necessary and proper to carry into effect the establishment, operation, and maintenance of such zones, all in accordance with the Act of Congress and other applicable laws and rules.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 83.

10-19.1-152.
Audit reports and audit of corporations receiving state subsidies for production of alcohol or methanol for combination with gasoline.

Any corporation that produces agricultural ethyl alcohol or methanol within this state and which receives a production subsidy from the state, whether in the form of reduced taxes or otherwise, shall submit an annual audit report, prepared by a certified public accountant based on an audit of all records and accounts of the corporation, to the legislative audit and fiscal review committee. The audit must be submitted within ninety days of the close of the corporation’s taxable year. Upon request of the legislative audit and fiscal review committee, the state auditor shall conduct an audit of the records and accounts of any corporation required to submit an annual report under this section.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 84.